Utah statutes.
58-77-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.

Grounds for refusing to issue a license to an applicant, for refusing to renew a license, for revoking, suspending, restricting, or placing on probation a license, for issuing a public or private reprimand, and for issuing a cease and desist order shall be in accordance with Section 58-1-401.



Enacted by Chapter 299, 2005 General Session

